src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON juohkkahasjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ttja%> K ;
 !+Sg+Abe:ttja%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:ttja%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:ttja%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dtja%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ttja%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:ttja%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Ess:dtja%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ttja%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ttja%>j K ;
 !+Pl+Abe:ttja%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ttja%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:ttja%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ttja%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ttja%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:ttja%>j K ;
 
LEXICON nubbecase
 +Attr:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%> K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:e%> NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Sg+Abe:e%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:e%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:e%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>s K ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:e%>t K ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:i%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:e%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>j K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:i%>j NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Pl+Abe:i%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:i%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:i%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:i%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:i%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:i%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:i%>j K ;

LEXICON juobbácase
 +Sg+Nom:%>   K ;	
 +Sg+Gen:%>Q1 K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:%>Q1 K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>Q1 K ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:%>Q1t K ; ! Spiik: in attr same as dem.pronouns
! +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
 !+Sg+Abe:#da K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>j   K ;
 +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>Q1jn K ;
    +Ess:%>n    K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>Q1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>Q1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Pl+Abe:j#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:%>Q1#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:%>Q1j#tagá K ; ! 
 
 foc-k ;

LEXICON gallicase
    +Sg+Ine+Attr:      K ;
    +Sg+Ill+Attr:      K ;
         +Sg+Nom:      K ;
         +Sg+Gen:      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Sg+Acc:v     K ;
         +Sg+Ill:j     K ;
         +Sg+Ela:s     K ; 
         +Sg+Ine:n     K ;
         +Sg+Com:jn    K ;
   !     +Sg+Abe:#da   K ;
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dak  K ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:#tagá K ; ! 

LEXICON goappásjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:tj%>a K ;
! +Sg+Abe:tj%>a#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:tj%>a#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:tj%>av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:tj%>ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:tj%>is K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:tj%>in K ;
 +Sg+Com:tj%>ijn K ;
 +Ess:tj%>in K ;
 goappátjacase ;
 
LEXICON goappátjacase
 +Pl+Nom:tj%>a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:tj%>ij K ;
 !+Pl+Abe:tj%>ij#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:tj%>ij#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:tj%>ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:tj%>ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:tj%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:tj%>ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:tj%>ij K ;
 +Pl+Com+Attr:tj%>ij K ;

LEXICON dimnacase
 +Attr: NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;

LEXICON divnacase
 +Attr:a%> NAMÁK ;
 +Attr+Use/NG:a%> K ; ! 
! +Sg+Nom:na%> K ; !only pl
! +Sg+Acc:a%>v K ; !only pl
 +Pl+Nom:a%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>j K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:a%>j NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:a%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:a%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>j K ;

LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:%>0 K ;
